Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-1512
Board; access to records; executive director; duties; employer education program.

(1) The Public Employees Retirement Board, for purposes of administering the various retirement systems under its jurisdiction, shall receive from the Department of Administrative Services and other employers such information as is necessary for the efficient and accurate administration of the systems and shall consult with the Department of Administrative Services and other employers as to the form in which the information is to be presented and received by the board. The information in the records shall be provided by the employers in an accurate and verifiable form, as specified by the executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems. The executive director shall, from time to time, carry out testing procedures to verify the accuracy of such information. The executive director shall have access to records maintained by the Department of Administrative Services on the Nebraska employees information system database for the purpose of obtaining any information which may be necessary to verify the accuracy of information and administer the systems and the holder of the records shall comply with a request by the executive director for access by providing such facts and information to the executive director in a timely manner.

(2) The executive director shall develop and implement an employer education program using principles generally accepted by public employee retirement systems so that all employers have the knowledge and information necessary to prepare and file reports as the board requires.

(3) The information obtained by the board pursuant to this section shall not be considered public records subject to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09, except that the following information shall be considered public records: The member's name, the retirement system in which the member is a participant, the date the member's participation in the retirement system commenced, and the date the member's participation in the retirement system ended, if applicable.

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 41;

Laws 2000, LB 1192, § 26;

Laws 2005, LB 503, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB188, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 50.
July 18, 2026